Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1991.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XII-DBILINGUAL EDUCATORS ADVANCEMENT GRANT PROGRAMSection 1201-D. Scope of article.This article relates to the recruitment, retention and support of bilingual certified teachers in public schools with a shortage of bilingual teachers.Section 1202-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 1234567891011121314151617181920 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Bilingual certified teacher." A teacher certified by the department, including the subject area of bilingual education or applicable academic subject, in which the teacher is to be employed and who is fully qualified under State certification requirements to teach in a bilingual education program in a public school setting."Board." The State Board of Education."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Grant program." The Bilingual Educators Advancement Grant Program established under section 1203-D."School district." Any common, union-free, central high school or city school district as defined in section 102."School with a bilingual teacher shortage." A public school in which there was a shortage of bilingual certified teachers in the previous school year and there is a projected shortage in the current school year as determined by the secretary using Statewide staffing data, district reports and other relevant indicators. Districts may appeal shortage designations through a secretary-established process."Secretary." The Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth."Year of service." Ten months of continuous full-time service as a teacher during a school year, generally occurring between September 1 and June 30 of the school year.Section 1203-D. Establishment.The Bilingual Educators Advancement Grant Program is established in the department for awarding grants to eligible individuals.Section 1204-D. Application and funding.20250HB1991PN2511 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Grant.--Grants shall be made to school districts for bilingual certified teacher recruitment and retention activities necessary to increase the number of bilingual certified teachers in schools with a bilingual teacher shortage. (b) Grant award.--Grants under subsection (a) shall be awarded to school districts, within the limits of funds appropriated, through a competitive process that takes into consideration the magnitude of any shortage of bilingual, certified teachers in the school district, the fiscal capacity of the district and the number of new bilingual certified teachers the school district intends to hire in the coming school year. Grants provided under this subsection shall be used only for the purposes enumerated in this section.(c) Limitation.--Not more than 60% of the funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be made available to any one school district. State funds provided under this section shall not supplant local funds for any purpose similar to the purposes of this section.(d) Application.--Applications by a school district for funding under this section shall be filed with the department on a form determined by the secretary, by June 1 of the base year. School districts shall be notified of a grant award by June 30 of the base year. In any year the application and award dates may be modified by the secretary for the reasonable administration of the program. An application shall include a plan by the school district for the expenditure of the funds in each category of allowable expenses and the expenditures shall be consistent with the plan and the provisions of this section.(e) Award.--A person may receive only one award under this section in a school year.20250HB1991PN2511 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Eligibility.--To be eligible for an award under this section, an applicant shall:(1) be a bilingual certified teacher;(2) agree to a service obligation of one year of service in a school with a bilingual teacher shortage as a condition of receiving an award under this section; and(3) be employed for the first time as a bilingual certified teacher in the school district.(g) Application and selection.--The board shall determine the number of eligible applicants who will receive an award under the grant program. If the number of eligible applicants exceeds the number of awards determined by the board under this section, the board shall use an objective competitive process based on educational qualifications to determine which eligible applicants shall receive an award.(h) Payment of awards.--Annual awards from funds provided for the purpose of this section shall be paid by the board to the award recipient. Awards received by a recipient shall not be considered as part of the recipients salary. The initial annual award shall be $10,000 and may be renewed each year, for up to three additional years, provided that the recipient agrees to one year of service as a full-time bilingual certified teacher in a school with a bilingual teacher shortage for each year of a renewed award and has provided satisfactory service in any prior year in which an initial or renewed award was granted to the recipient. No awards shall be made for less than one school year of service and the sum of any initial and renewed awards shall not exceed $40,000. Awards made under this section shall be used to reimburse any educational costs, including those for which student loans may have been taken, incurred by the 20250HB1991PN2511 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recipient prior to receipt of the award for certification as a teacher in a public school. The board shall develop and secure a written agreement from the recipient outlining the service obligation of the recipient. The agreement shall include provisions for the recipient to repay the amount of the award to the school district if the recipient fails to complete the service obligation in any year where an initial or renewed award is granted, and the repaid amounts shall be deducted from any grant amounts due to the district from the Commonwealth under this section. Upon a written appeal by an award recipient, the board may provide a waiver of repayment provisions for an award recipient who fails to complete the service requirement for documented reasons of health or other severe hardship, as determined by the secretary.(i) Notification.--The board shall notify both successful and unsuccessful applicants by September 1 of any school year for which an initial or renewed award is provided to a teacher under this section.(j) Reporting.--By November 1 following the completion of each school year, the secretary shall report to the Governor and each member of the General Assembly regarding the program and include:(1) the amount of each school district's total grant under this section;(2) the use of the grant and number of awards granted by type; and(3) an analysis of the effectiveness of the program in recruiting and retaining bilingual certified teachers in schools.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1991PN2511 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930